North Carolina statutes. Chapter 143A. State Government Reorganization.
Article 15. Department of Commerce. [Repealed]

§§ 143A-171 through 143A-180.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 198, s. 25.

§§ 143A-180.1,
143A-180.2.

Recodified as §§ 143B-448, 143B-449 by Session Laws 1977, c. 198, s. 26.

Cross References.

For statute prohibiting master electric and natural gas meters in residential buildings, enacted as G.S. 143A-180.4 by Session Laws 1977, c. 792, s. 9, see

G.S. 143-151.42

.

§ 143A-181.
[Repealed]

Recodified as § 143B-439 by Session Laws 1977, c. 198, s. 26.

§§ 143A-182 through 143A-185.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1977, c. 198, s. 25.